Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Article 2. Enforcement and Forfeiture.

Cross references. —

For applicability of the forfeiture provisions of AS

17.30.100

—

17.30.126

to imitation controlled substances, see AS

11.73.060

.

Sec. 17.30.100.
Powers of the Department of Public Safety.

The commissioner of public safety shall enforce this chapter and shall cooperate with other state and federal agencies in the discharge of their responsibilities pertaining to illicit traffic in controlled substances and in suppressing the abuse of controlled substances. Under this section, the powers of the commissioner of public safety include the following:

arranging for the exchange of information among government officials concerning illicit traffic in and abuse of controlled substances;

coordinating training programs pertaining to controlled substances at both local and state levels;

cooperating with the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Department of Justice by establishing a centralized unit to accept, catalog, file, and collect statistics, including records of persons who have violated the provisions of this chapter or AS 11.71 in the state and making the information available for federal, state, and local law enforcement purposes; and

instituting in the superior court actions for injunctions against continued manufacture, distribution, dispensation, or research with a controlled substance in the state by a person who violates 21 U.S.C. 811 — 830 (Controlled Substances Act) or the regulations adopted under those sections.

The commissioner of public safety may not furnish the name or identity of a patient or research subject whose identity could not be obtained under AS

17.30.155

.

The Department of Public Safety, in accordance with AS 37.07 (the Executive Budget Act), may apply for and accept money necessary to exchange information concerning narcotics trafficking between the states, or otherwise related to the enforcement of AS 11.71 or AS 11.73.

The Department of Public Safety or a local law enforcement agency may accept from the United States Attorney General property, including money, that is forfeited under 21 U.S.C. 881 (the Controlled Substances Act). The Department of Public Safety and local law enforcement agencies shall, in accordance with 21 U.S.C. 881 (e) and regulations and policies adopted under that section, use property and the proceeds of property obtained under this subsection in the enforcement of this chapter, AS 11.71, and municipal ordinances substantially similar to this chapter and AS 11.71.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 34 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 146 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1988; am § 29 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 55 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), deleted “but are not limited to” following “include” near the end; in (a)(4), deleted the comma following “superior court”.

Sec. 17.30.110.
Items subject to forfeiture.

The following may be forfeited to the state:

a controlled substance that has been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, acquired, or possessed in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71;

raw materials, products, and equipment that are used or intended for use in manufacturing, distributing, compounding, processing, delivering, importing, or exporting a controlled substance that is a felony under this chapter or AS 11.71;

property that is used or intended for use as a container for property described in (1) or (2) of this section;

a conveyance, including but not limited to aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, that has been used or is intended for use in transporting or in any manner in facilitating the transportation, sale, receipt, possession, or concealment of property described in (1) or (2) of this section in violation of a felony offense under this chapter or AS 11.71; however,

a conveyance may not be forfeited under this paragraph if the owner of the conveyance establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, at a hearing before the court as the trier of fact, that use of the conveyance in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 was committed by another person and that the owner was neither a consenting party nor privy to the violation;

a forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a valid security interest at the time of seizure is subject to the interest of the secured party if the secured party establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, at a hearing before the court as the trier of fact, that use of the conveyance in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 was committed by another person and that the secured party was neither a consenting party nor privy to the violation;

books, records, and research products and materials, including formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data, that are used in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71;

money, securities, negotiable instruments, or other things of value used in financial transactions derived from activity prohibited by this chapter or AS 11.71; and

a firearm that is visible, carried during, or used in furtherance of a violation of this chapter or AS 11.71.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

AS 17.30.110(b)-(q) were renumbered as AS

17.30.112

—

17.30.126

in 1983.

Sec. 17.30.112.
Proceedings resulting in forfeiture.

Property listed in AS

17.30.110

may be forfeited to the state either upon conviction of the defendant of a violation of this chapter or AS 11.71, or upon judgment of a court in a separate civil proceeding in rem. The court may order a forfeiture in the in rem proceeding if it finds that an item specified in AS

17.30.110

was used during or in aid of a violation of this chapter or AS 11.71.

It is not a defense in an in rem proceeding brought under this section that a criminal proceeding has resulted in a conviction or conviction of a lesser offense for a violation of this chapter or AS 11.71.

When forfeiting property under (a) of this section, a court may award to a municipal law enforcement agency that participated in the arrest or conviction of the defendant, the seizure of property, or the identification of property for seizure, (1) the property if the property is worth $5,000 or less and is not money or some other thing that is divisible, or (2) up to 75 percent of the property or the value of the property if the property is worth more than $5,000 or is money or some other thing that is divisible. In determining the percentage a municipal law enforcement agency may receive under this subsection, the court shall consider the municipal law enforcement agency’s total involvement in the case relative to the involvement of the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 7 ch 129 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (a) and (b) were formerly AS 17.30.110(b) and (c).
Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 17.30.114.
Seizure and custody of property.

Property listed in AS

17.30.110

may be seized by a peace officer upon an order issued by a court having jurisdiction over the property upon a showing of probable cause that the property may be forfeited under AS

17.30.110

. Seizure without a court order may be made if

the seizure is incident to a valid arrest or a search under a valid search warrant;

the property subject to seizure has been the subject of an earlier judgment in favor of the state in a criminal proceeding or civil proceeding in rem under this chapter or AS 11.71; or

there is probable cause that the property was used, is being used, or is intended for use, in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 and the property is easily movable; property seized under this paragraph may not be held for more than 48 hours without a court order obtained to continue its detention.

Property taken or detained under (a) of this section shall be held in the custody of either the commissioner of public safety or a municipal law enforcement agency authorized by the commissioner of public safety to retain custody of property listed in AS

17.30.110

subject only to the orders and decrees of the court having jurisdiction over any forfeiture proceedings. If property is seized under this chapter, the commissioner of public safety or an authorized municipal law enforcement agency may

place the property under seal;

remove the property to a place designated by the court;

take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate location for disposition in accordance with law; or

with court approval, transfer the property to another state or federal law enforcement agency for forfeiture proceedings by that agency; the court having jurisdiction shall grant the approval under this paragraph if the property

will be retained within the jurisdiction of the court by the agency to which the property is being transferred; or

is

not needed as evidence; or

needed as evidence, and the property is fungible or the property’s evidentiary value can otherwise be preserved without retaining the property within the jurisdiction of the court.

Within 10 days after a seizure under AS

17.30.110

—

17.30.126

, the commissioner of public safety shall make an inventory of any property seized, including controlled substances, and shall appraise the value of any items seized other than controlled substances.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 129 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 17.30.110(d)-(f). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 17.30.116.
Procedure for forfeiture action.

Within 20 days after a seizure under AS

17.30.110

—

17.30.126

, the commissioner of public safety shall, by certified mail, notify any person known to have an interest in an item with an appraised value of $500 or more, or who is ascertainable from official registration numbers, licenses, or other state, federal, or municipal numbers on the item, of the pending forfeiture action. Additionally, the commissioner of public safety shall publish notice of forfeiture action of an item valued at $500 or more in a newspaper of general circulation in the judicial district in which the seizure was made, or if no newspaper is published in that judicial district, in a newspaper published in the state and distributed in that judicial district. The notice shall be published once each week during four consecutive calendar weeks. The requirements of this subsection do not apply to the forfeiture of controlled substances which have been manufactured, distributed, dispensed, or possessed in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71, regardless of their value.

Upon service or publication of notice of commencement of a forfeiture action under this section, a person claiming interest in the property shall file within 30 days after the service or publication, a notice of claim setting out the nature of the interest, the date it was acquired, the consideration paid, and an answer to the state’s allegations. If a claim and answer is not filed within the time specified, the property described in the state’s allegation must be ordered forfeited to the state without further proceedings or showings.

Questions of fact or law raised by a notice of forfeiture action and answer of a claimant in an action commenced under this section must be determined by the court sitting without a jury. This proceeding may be held in abeyance until conclusion of any pending criminal charges against the claimant under this chapter or AS 11.71.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 17.30.110(g)-(i). Renumbered in 1983.

Cross references. —

For penalty for failure to furnish notification required under this chapter, see AS

11.71.050(a)(3)

.

Sec. 17.30.118.
Petition for release of seized items.

A claimant under AS

17.30.116(b)

may at any time petition for release of a seized item as follows:

to a court in which a warrant for seizure has been issued;

to a court in which a criminal or civil action alleging forfeiture of the item has been filed; or

before an action is filed, or if no seizure warrant was issued, to a court in the judicial district in which the violation took place.

An item may not be released by the court under (a) of this section unless the claimant gives adequate assurance that the item will remain subject to the court’s jurisdiction and

the court finds that the release is in the best interests of the state; or

the claimant provides a bond or other valid and equivalent security equal to twice the assessed value of the item.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 17.30.110(j) and (k).
Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 17.30.120.
Petition for sale of seized item.

A claimant may petition the court for sale of an item before final disposition of court proceedings. The court shall grant a petition for sale upon a finding that the sale is in the best interests of the state and the preservation and maintenance of the item seized.
Proceeds from the sale plus interest to the date of final disposition of the court proceedings become the subject of the forfeiture action.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

17.30.110

(

l

). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 17.30.122.
State disposal of forfeited property.

Property forfeited under AS

17.30.110

—

17.30.126

other than controlled substances and firearms shall be disposed of by the commissioner of administration in accordance with applicable law. Firearms shall be disposed of as provided in AS

18.65.340

. As to property other than firearms or controlled substances, the commissioner of administration may

destroy property harmful to the public;

sell the property and use the proceeds for payment of all proper expenses of the proceedings for forfeiture and sale, including expenses of seizure, custody, and court costs;

take custody of the property and authorize its use in the enforcement of this chapter or AS 11.71, or transfer it to another agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state for a use in furtherance of the administration of justice;

take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in accordance with law;

forward it to the Drug Enforcement Administration of the United States Department of Justice for disposition; or

transfer ownership of an aircraft to the Alaska Wing, Civil Air Patrol.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 18 SLA 1983; am § 4 ch 13 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 17.30.110(m). Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 17.30.124.
Remittance to claimant.

Upon a showing that a claimant is entitled to remittance under AS

17.30.110

—

17.30.126

, the court shall order that

if the claimant is entitled to the item, it shall be delivered to the claimant immediately;

if the claimant is entitled to remittance of some value less than the total value of the item, the claimant is entitled, at the claimant’s choice, to receive either the value of the claimant’s interest or, upon receipt of payment of the difference in value by the claimant, the entire item.

An offender who used an item subject to remission in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 shall be assessed a fine which may not be less than the cost of any lien payment or remittance made by the state plus the reasonable costs of the seizure.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 17.30.110(n) and (o).
Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 17.30.126.
Forfeiture of controlled substances.

A controlled substance manufactured, possessed, transferred, sold, or offered for sale in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71 is contraband and must be seized and summarily forfeited to the state. The commissioner of public safety or the commissioner’s designee, including a municipal law enforcement agency authorized under AS

17.30.114(b)

to retain custody of controlled substances, is responsible for the disposal of controlled substances which have been forfeited. The controlled substances shall be disposed of in accordance with procedures and requirements prescribed by the commissioner.

Plants from which controlled substances may be derived and which have been planted or cultivated in violation of this chapter or AS 11.71, or which are grown in the wild, may be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 45 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 17.30.110(p) and (q).
Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 17.30.130.
Judicial review.
[Repealed, § 22 ch 146 SLA 1986.]